Idaho, session 2025, H0318.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1021, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1021. MATH AND SCIENCE REQUIREMENT. In order to meet state gradua-
tion requirements regarding math and science courses, moneys shall be dis-
tributed to school districts to defray the cost of providing additional math
and science courses. Moneys so distributed shall be used to hire additional
high school math and science teachers or to defray costs associated with pro-
viding math and science courses to high school students. Moneys shall be
distributed to school districts from the moneys appropriated to the educa-
tional support program for each regular high school, not including alterna-
tive schools, based on the following criteria:
(1) For each school with enrollment of 99 or less, distribute the equiv-
alent of one and one-quarter (1.25) of a classified staff position.
(2) For each school with enrollment of 100 to 159, distribute the equiv-
alent of one ninth (1/9) of a classified staff position one-half (0.50) of an
instructional staff position, based on the statewide average funding per po-
sition.
(3) For each school with enrollment of 160 to 319, distribute the equiv-
alent of two sevenths (2/7) of a classified staff position three-quarters
(0.75) of an instructional staff position, based on the statewide average
funding per position.
(4) For each school with enrollment of 320 to 639, distribute the equiv-
alent of one (1.0) instructional staff position, based on the statewide av-
erage funding per position.
(5) For each school with enrollment of 640 or more, distribute the
equivalent of one (1.0) instructional staff position, based on the statewide
average funding per position, and three-quarters (0.75) of a classified
staff position. For the purposes of these school size classifications for
regular high schools that serve only grades 10-12, ninth grade 9 students
who will attend the regular high school upon matriculating to tenth grade 10
shall be included as enrolled in the regular high school.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.